Utah statutes.
20A-7-304.   Circulation requirements -- Lieutenant governor to provide sponsors with materials.

(1)  In order to obtain the necessary number of signatures required by this part, the sponsors shall circulate referendum packets that meet the form requirements of this part.

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall furnish to the sponsors:

(a)  a copy of the referendum petition; and

(b)  a signature sheet.

(3)  The sponsors of the petition shall:

(a)  arrange and pay for the printing of all additional copies of the petition and signature sheets; and

(b)  ensure that the copies of the petition and signature sheets meet the form requirements of this section.

(4) (a)  The sponsors may prepare the referendum for circulation by creating multiple referendum packets.

(b)  The sponsors shall create those packets by binding a copy of the referendum petition, a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum, and no more than 50 signature sheets together at the top in such a way that the packets may be conveniently opened for signing.

(c)  The sponsors need not attach a uniform number of signature sheets to each referendum packet.

(5) (a)  After the sponsors have prepared sufficient referendum packets, they shall return them to the lieutenant governor.

(b)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(i)  number each of the referendum packets and return them to the sponsors within five working days; and

(ii)  keep a record of the numbers assigned to each packet.



Amended by Chapter 153, 1995 General Session

